Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2213
Sales, transfers, exchange of investments; requirements.

Any sales, transfers, or exchange of investments made by a domestic company between any of the separate accounts or between any other investment account of the company and one or more of the separate accounts shall be in accordance with section 44-402.03, and the provisions or lack of provisions concerning transfers of investments in the laws of foreign companies shall be taken into consideration in admission of a foreign company.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 13, p. 1265;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 65.